Washington statutes.
RCW 32.12.050

Accounting—Entry of assets, real estate, securities, etc.

(1) No savings bank shall by any system of accounting, or any device of bookkeeping, directly or indirectly, enter any of its assets upon its books in the name of any other individual, partnership, unincorporated association, or corporation, or under any title or designation that is not in accordance with the actual facts.

(2) The bonds, notes, mortgages, or other interest bearing obligations purchased or acquired by a savings bank, shall not be entered on its books at more than the actual cost thereof, and shall not thereafter be carried upon its books for a longer period than until the next declaration of dividends, or in any event for more than one year, at a valuation exceeding their present cost as determined by amortization, that is, by deducting from the cost of any such security purchased for a sum in excess of the amount payable thereon at maturity and charging to "profit and loss" a sufficient sum to bring it to par at maturity, or adding to the cost of any such security purchased at less than the amount payable thereon at maturity and crediting to "profit and loss" a sufficient sum to bring it to par at maturity.

(3) No such bank shall enter, or at any time carry on its books, the real estate and the building or buildings thereon used by it as its place of business at a valuation exceeding their actual cost to the bank.

(4) Every such bank shall conform its methods of keeping its books and records to such orders in respect thereof as shall have been made and promulgated by the director. Any officer, agent, or employee of any savings bank who refuses or neglects to obey any such order shall be punished as hereinafter provided.

(5) Real estate acquired by a savings bank, other than that acquired for use as a place of business, may be entered on the books of the bank at the actual cost thereof but shall not be carried beyond the current dividend period at an amount in excess of the amount of the debt in protection of which such real estate was acquired, plus the cost of any improvements thereto.

An appraisal shall be made by a qualified person of every such parcel of real estate within six months from the date of conveyance. If the value at which such real estate is carried on the books is in excess of the value found on appraisal the book value shall, at the end of the dividend period during which such appraisal was made, be reduced to an amount not in excess of such appraised value.

(6) No such bank shall enter or carry on its books any asset which has been disallowed by the director or the trustees of such bank, unless the director upon application by such savings bank has fixed a valuation at which such asset may be carried as permitted in subsection (7) of this section.

(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, no savings bank may maintain its books and records or enter and carry on its books any asset or liability at any valuation contrary to any accounting rules promulgated or adopted by the federal deposit insurance corporation or the director or contrary to generally accepted accounting principles.

[ 1994 c 256 s 100; 1994 c 92 s 325; 1985 c 56 s 7; 1983 c 44 s 1; 1955 c 13 s 32.12.050. Prior: 1941 c 15 s 1; 1915 c 175 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 3345.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1994 c 92 s 325 and by 1994 c 256 s 100, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.